Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB17.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 8-1909 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-
1909. (a) No vehicle or combination of vehicles shall be moved or
operated on any highway when the gross weight on two or more
consecutive axles exceeds the limitations prescribed in the following table:
Distance in feet between the Maximum load in pounds carried
extremes of any group of on any group of 2 or more
2 or more consecutive axles consecutive axles
2 axles 3 axles 4 axles 5 axles 6 axles 7 axles 8 axles
4............34,000
5............34,000
6............34,000
7............34,000
8 and
less........34,000 34,000
More
than 8.....38,000 42,000
9............39,000 42,500
10..........40,000 43,500
11..........................44,000
12.........................45,000 50,000
13.........................45,500 50,500
14.........................46,500 51,500
15.........................47,000 52,000
16.........................48,000 52,500 58,000
17.........................48,500 53,500 58,500
18.........................49,500 54,000 59,000
19.........................50,000 54,500 60,000
20.........................51,000 55,500 60,500 66,000
21.........................51,500 56,000 61,000 66,500
22.........................52,500 56,500 61,500 67,000

SB 17 2
Distance in feet between the Maximum load in pounds carried
extremes of any group of on any group of 2 or more
2 or more consecutive axles consecutive axles
2 axles 3 axles 4 axles 5 axles 6 axles 7 axles 8 axles
23.........................53,000 57,500 62,500 68,000
24.........................54,000 58,000 63,000 68,500 74,000
25.........................54,500 58,500 63,500 69,000 74,500
26.........................55,500 59,500 64,000 69,500 75,000
27.........................56,000 60,000 65,000 70,000 75,500
28.........................57,000 60,500 65,500 71,000 76,500 82,000
29.........................57,500 61,500 66,000 71,500 77,000 82,500
30.........................58,500 62,000 66,500 72,000 77,500 83,000
31.........................59,000 62,500 67,500 72,500 78,000 83,500
32.........................60,000 63,500 68,000 73,000 78,500 84,500
33........................................64,000 68,500 74,000 79,000 85,000
34........................................64,500 69,000 74,500 80,000 85,500
35........................................65,500 70,000 75,000 80,500
36........................................66,000 70,500 75,500 81,000
37........................................66,500 71,000 76,000 81,500
38........................................67,500 72,000 77,000 82,000
39........................................68,000 72,500 77,500 82,500
40........................................68,500 73,000 78,000 83,500
41........................................69,500 73,500 78,500 84,000
42........................................70,000 74,000 79,000 84,500
43........................................70,500 75,000 80,000 85,000
44........................................71,500 75,500 80,500 85,500
45........................................72,000 76,000 81,000
46........................................72,500 76,500 81,500
47........................................73,500 77,500 82,000
48........................................74,000 78,000 83,000
49........................................74,500 78,500 83,500
50........................................75,500 79,000 84,000
51........................................76,000 80,000 84,500
52........................................76,500 80,500 85,000
53........................................77,500 81,000 85,500
54........................................78,000 81,500
55........................................78,500 82,500
56........................................79,500 83,000
57........................................80,000 83,500
58.......................................................84,000
59.......................................................85,000
60.......................................................85,500
except that two consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry a gross load of

SB 17 3
34,000 pounds each if the overall distance between the first and last axles
is 36 feet or more.
(1) The gross weight on any one axle of a vehicle shall not exceed the
limits prescribed in K.S.A. 8-1908, and amendments thereto.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (e), for vehicles and
combinations of vehicles on the interstate system the table in this section
shall not authorize a maximum gross weight of more than 80,000 pounds.
(3) The table in this section shall not apply to truck tractor and dump
semitrailer or truck trailer combination when such are used as a
combination unit exclusively for the transportation of sand, salt for
highway maintenance operations, gravel, slag stone, limestone, crushed
stone, cinders, coal, blacktop, dirt or fill material, when such vehicles are
used or for transportation to a construction site, highway maintenance or
construction project or other storage facility, except that such vehicles or
combination of vehicles shall not be exempted from any application of the
table as may be required to determine applicable axle weights for triple
and quad axles as defined in K.S.A. 8-1908, and amendments thereto. As
used in this paragraph (3), the term "dump semitrailer" means any
semitrailer designed in such a way as to divest itself of the load carried
thereon.
(4) (A) In the case of a vehicle or combination of vehicles exclusively
carrying grain or other seasonally harvested products during the normal
harvest season from the field where such grain or products are harvested
to storage, market or stockpile or from stockpile to market or factory up to
50 miles, the load may be up to:
(i) 10% greater than the maximum weight shown in the table in this
section for vehicles with tandem, triple or quad axles; or
(ii) 12.5% greater than the maximum weight shown in the table in
this section for vehicles with a single rear axle.
(B) For vehicles and combinations of vehicles, the maximum gross
weight authorized under this paragraph shall not exceed 90,000 pounds.
(C) This paragraph does not apply to the national system of
interstate and defense highways.
(b) Any vehicle registered under the laws of this state which vehicle
is designed and used primarily for the transportation of property or for the
transportation of 10 or more persons may, at the time of its registration, be
subjected by the director of vehicles to investigation or test as may be
necessary to enable such director to determine whether such vehicle may
safely be operated upon the highways in compliance with all provisions of
this act. Every such vehicle shall meet the following requirements:
(1) It shall be equipped with brakes as required in K.S.A. 8-1734, and
amendments thereto.
(2) Every motor vehicle to be operated outside of business and

SB 17 4
residence districts shall have motive power adequate to propel such
vehicle and any load thereon or to be drawn thereby, at a speed which that
will not impede or block the normal and reasonable movement of traffic.
Exception to this requirement shall be recognized when reduced speed is
necessary for safe operation or when a vehicle or combination of vehicles
is necessarily or in compliance with law or police direction proceeding at
reduced speed.
(c) It shall be unlawful for any person to operate any vehicle or
combination of vehicles with a gross weight in excess of the limitations set
forth in article 19 of chapter 8 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and
amendments thereto, except as provided in K.S.A. 8-1911, and
amendments thereto.
(d) As used in this section, "interstate system" means the national
system of interstate and defense highways.
(e) A vehicle, if operated by an engine fueled primarily by natural
gas, may exceed any vehicle weight limit under this section, up to a
maximum gross vehicle weight of 82,000 pounds, by an amount that is
equal to the difference between:
(1) The weight of the vehicle attributable to the natural gas tank and
fueling system carried by that vehicle; and
(2) the weight of a comparable diesel tank and fueling system.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 8-1909 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.